Hawaii statutes.
§346-236 Permanent changes. Permanent
changes in the living situation of a vulnerable adult who has incurred abuse
shall not ordinarily be made under authority of this part. If permanent
changes in the living situation or nonemergency medical treatment are
necessary, the appropriate guardianship, or civil commitment action shall be
initiated pursuant to applicable state law. [L 1989, c 381, pt of §1; am L
1990, c 144, §1 and c 234, §9; am L 2008, c 154, §17]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next